Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  State
Lands, for the following purposes:
(1) Common School Fund
programs................................... $ 32,221,696
(2) Oregon Removal-Fill
Mitigation Fund ........................ $ 1,910,274
(3) South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve operations.................... $ 2,028,962
(4) Capital improvements ............... $ 514,470
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of State Lands for
the following purposes:
(1) South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve operations.................... $ 2,052,318
(2) Common School Fund
programs................................... $ 212,323
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $100,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from the Submerged Lands Enhancement Fund established under ORS 274.388.
SECTION 4.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures  by the Department
of State Lands for tenant-incurred utility charges, unclaimed property finders fees and State
Treasurer charges for investment-related transactions are not limited.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5537 (SB 5537-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate May 17, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5537 (SB 5537-A) Page 2